North Carolina, session 2025, HB882.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. ESTABLISH EXTENDED PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY FOR CERTAIN
PRODUCERS OF PACKAGING MATERIALS
SECTION 1.(a) Article 9 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new Part to read:
"Part 2K. Extended Producer Responsibility.
"§ 130A-309.250. Definitions.
Unless a different meaning is required by the context, the following definitions apply
throughout this Part:
(1) Collector. – Any publicly or privately owned solid waste management
services or recycler that gathers discarded packaging materials from
residential, commercial, industrial, or governmental establishments.
(2) Fulfillment service provider. – A person that handles, on behalf of a
responsible producer, products in which the producer retains a property
interest and offers at least two of the following services as part of a
commercial activity: (i) warehousing, (ii) packaging, and (iii) addressing and
shipping. For purposes of this Part, "fulfillment service provider" does not
include postal or freight service providers.
(3) Packaging material. – Any part of a package or container, regardless of
recyclability or compostability, including material types such as paper, plastic,
glass, or metal, that is used for the containment, protection, handling, delivery,
transport, distribution, and presentation of a product that is sold, offered for
sale, or distributed in North Carolina. Bags are included within this definition.
Packaging material does not include any of the following:
a. Material, or a category of material, intended to be used for long-term
storage or protection of a durable product that can be expected to be
usable for that purpose for a period of at least five years.
*H882-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. Medical devices and packaging that are included with products
regulated as a drug, medical device, or dietary supplement under the
Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. § 321, et seq.
c. Packaging products used to contain substances hazardous to the
environment, regulated under the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and
Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. § 136, et seq.
(4) Postconsumer waste material. – As defined in G.S. 105-129.25.
(5) Producer responsibility fund. – A privately held account established and
managed by the producer responsibility organization pursuant to
G.S. 130A-309.237(d).
(6) Producer responsibility organization or organization. – A not-for-profit entity
formed by one or more responsible producers to act as an agent on behalf of
each producer to develop and implement a stewardship plan.
(7) Readily-recyclable. – Recyclable material, as defined in G.S. 130A-290, that
the Department determines can be sorted by business entities in this State and
has a consistent market for purchase.
(8) Recycling rate. – The percentage of discarded packaging material that is
managed through recycling or reuse, which is calculated by dividing the
amount of discarded packaging material collected and recycled or reused by
the total amount of discarded packaging material collected over a program
year.
(9) Responsible producer or producer. – Any of the following:
a. A person that manufactures a product contained, protected, delivered,
presented, or distributed in or using packaging material and sells,
offers for sale, uses in a commercial enterprise, or distributes the
product in or into the State under the brand of the manufacturer.
b. If sub-subdivision a. of this subdivision does not apply, a person who
is not the manufacturer of the product but is the owner or licensee of a
trademark under which the product contained, protected, delivered,
presented, or distributed in or using packaging material is sold, offered
for sale, used in a commercial enterprise, or distributed in or into the
State, regardless of whether the trademark is registered.
c. If sub-subdivisions a. and b. of this subdivision do not apply, a person
that sells a product contained, protected, delivered, presented, or
distributed in or using packaging material and is intended to be filled
in the State at the point of sale.
d. If sub-subdivisions a., b., and c. of this subdivision do not apply, a
person that sells, offers for sale, uses in a commercial enterprise, or
distributes a product contained, protected, delivered, presented, or
distributed in or using packaging material.
e. Fulfillment service providers.
(10) Reusable. – An object or material designed to be used repeatedly for a number
of use cycles.
(11) Stewardship plan. – A detailed plan that describes the manner in which
responsible producers shall comply with the requirements of this Part and all
rules adopted by the Commission pursuant to this Part.
"§ 130A-309.251. Requirements for responsible producers.
(a) Registration Required. – Each responsible producer shall register with the Department
before selling, offering for sale, or distributing in North Carolina a product contained, protected,
delivered, presented, or distributed in or using packaging materials.
Page 2 House Bill 882-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) Stewardship Plan Required. – No responsible producer shall sell, offer for sale, or
distribute in North Carolina a product contained, protected, delivered, presented, or distributed
in or using packaging materials unless the producer participates as a member of a producer
responsibility organization for which a stewardship plan is approved by the Department, and
through that participation, satisfies the requirements of subsections (c), (d), and (e) of this section.
(c) Non-Reusable Packaging Material Reduction Requirements. – According to the
following schedule, each responsible producer shall reduce the total amount of non-reusable
packaging materials used for containing, protecting, delivering, presenting, and distributing
products sold, offered for sale, or distributed in this State (i) by unit, (ii) on average, and (iii) in
the aggregate:
(1) Ten percent (10%) after two years following approval of the stewardship plan.
(2) Twenty percent (20%) after four years following approval of the stewardship
plan.
(3) Thirty percent (30%) after six years following approval of the stewardship
plan.
(4) Forty percent (40%) after eight years following approval of the stewardship
plan.
The reductions required by this subsection shall be measured against the total amount of
packaging material the responsible producer used for containing, protecting, delivering,
presenting, and distributing the products it sold, offered for sale, or distributed in this State during
the respective calendar year.
(d) Recycling-Rate Requirements. – Each responsible producer shall ensure that all
non-reusable packaging material, in the aggregate, used for containing, protecting, delivering,
presenting, and distributing the products it sold, offered for sale, or distributed in this State is
recycled at a rate consistent with the following schedule:
(1) Fifty percent (50%) after five years following approval of the stewardship
plan.
(2) Eighty percent (80%) after eight years following approval of the stewardship
plan.
(3) Ninety percent (90%) after 12 years following approval of the stewardship
plan.
(e) Postconsumer Waste Material Content Requirements. – Each responsible producer
shall ensure that all non-reusable packaging material used for containing, protecting, delivering,
presenting, and distributing the products it sold, offered for sale, or distributed in this State
incorporates, on average and in the aggregate, the following amount, by weight, of postconsumer
waste material in accordance with the following schedule:
(1) Fifty percent (50%) after five years following approval of the stewardship
plan.
(2) Eighty percent (80%) after eight years following approval of the stewardship
plan.
(3) Ninety percent (90%) after 12 years following approval of the stewardship
plan.
"§ 130A-309.252. Producer responsibility organizations; participation fees.
(a) Membership Requirement. – Each responsible producer shall establish or join a
producer responsibility organization to act as an agent on behalf of the producer for the purposes
of satisfying its obligations under this Part. A producer may participate in more than one producer
responsibility organization if each organization is established for a different category of
packaging materials. Any producer responsibility organization formed for the purpose of
complying with this Part shall be established and operated as an organization described in section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
House Bill 882-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) Participation Fees. – A producer responsibility organization shall establish
participation fees for its member producers that are sufficient to cover all costs of developing and
implementing the stewardship plan, including each producer's proportionate share of
administrative, enforcement, and outreach and education costs. The participation fee must reflect
the per ton costs associated with the collection, processing, transportation, and recycling and
disposal of a producer's packaging material.
(c) Fee Structure. – A producer responsibility organization shall structure the
participation fees to provide producers with financial incentives to reward waste reduction and
recycling compatibility innovations and practices and to discourage designs or practices that
increase costs of managing the products. The producer responsibility organization may adjust
fees to be paid by each participating producer based on factors that affect system costs. At a
minimum, fees shall be variable based on the following:
(1) Costs to provide curbside collection of packaging material, or other levels of
collection service, that is, at a minimum, as convenient as the recycling
collection service offered in the particular jurisdiction prior to the
implementation of the stewardship plan.
(2) Costs to process a producer's packaging material for acceptance by secondary
material markets.
(3) Whether the packaging material includes labels, inks, and adhesives
containing heavy metals or other hazardous wastes that would contaminate
the recycling process.
(4) Whether the packaging material is specifically designed to be reusable or
refillable and has a high reuse or refill rate.
(5) The percentage of postconsumer waste material in a producer's packaging
material.
(6) Contributions to greenhouse gas emissions from the production, use,
collection, processing, and marketing of the packaging material.
The producer responsibility organization shall annually evaluate, revise, and submit an
updated fee assessment schedule to the Department.
(d) Producer Responsibility Fund. – A producer responsibility organization shall
establish and manage a producer responsibility fund. The organization shall deposit into the fund
all payments received from responsible producers in accordance with this section and shall
expend those funds for the following uses:
(1) To reimburse participating collectors in accordance with G.S. 130A-309.240.
(2) To fund collection and convenience obligations, required pursuant to
G.S. 130A-309.241.
(3) To fund the outreach and education programming, required pursuant to
G.S. 130A-309.243.
(4) To fund the actual operating costs of the organization, which may not exceed
the estimated operating costs indicated in the stewardship plan approved by
the Department pursuant to G.S. 130A-309.239.
(5) To pay fees assessed by the Department for the purposes of implementing this
Part.
(e) Payment of Participation Fees. – No later than 30 days after the approval of the
stewardship plan under G.S. 130A-309.239, and quarterly thereafter, a responsible producer shall
pay the producer responsibility organization any outstanding participation fees, to be deposited
into the producer responsibility fund.
(f) Producer Information Requirement. – A responsible producer participating in a
producer responsibility organization shall provide the organization with all information
necessary (i) for determining the producer's compliance with the stewardship plan and (ii) for
calculating the participation fees to be assessed to the producer.
Page 4 House Bill 882-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 130A-309.253. Stewardship plan.
(a) Each producer responsibility organization shall develop and submit a stewardship
plan to the Department. Such plan shall be effective for five years and shall be reviewed and
updated every five years following the approval of the initial plan. The Department may require
the stewardship plan to be reviewed or revised prior to the five-year period if the Department has
cause to believe the minimum non-reusable packaging material reduction rates, the minimum
recycling rates, the minimum postconsumer waste material content rates, or other requirements
established in accordance with an approved stewardship plan are not being met or followed by
the responsible producer or producer responsibility organization, or if there has been a change in
circumstances that warrants revision to the stewardship plan.
(b) Each stewardship plan shall contain, at a minimum, all of the following:
(1) Contact information for the producer responsibility organization and the
responsible producers covered under the stewardship plan.
(2) A comprehensive list of the packaging materials for which the producer or
producer responsibility organization is responsible under the stewardship
plan.
(3) A description of how the producer responsibility organization, along with its
member producers, will meet or exceed the requirements established in
G.S. 130A-309.236.
(4) A description of how the packaging materials covered under the stewardship
plan will be collected and managed using environmentally sound management
practices.
(5) A description of how the producer responsibility organization will work with
collectors to comply with the collection and convenience requirements
pursuant to G.S. 130A-309.241.
(6) A proposal for implementing the outreach and education program, required
pursuant to G.S. 130A-309.243, in a manner that increases access to recycling
throughout the State.
(7) A proposal for implementing the labeling requirements pursuant to
G.S. 130A-309.242, including a description of how the producer
responsibility organization will ensure compliance by assisting its member
producers and regularly verifying labeling claims through independent,
third-party audits.
(8) A description of the participation fees and the methodology used for
determining the structure of the participation fees, allocated to responsible
producers, that meet the requirements of this Part and are sufficient to cover
the cost of developing, submitting, implementing, and updating the
stewardship plan and maintaining a financial reserve sufficient to implement
the stewardship plan in a financially prudent and responsible manner.
(9) A description of how the producer responsibility organization plans to
establish and manage the producer responsibility fund, including staffing to
manage the fund, ensuring equity of access to collection opportunities for
customers across the State, providing technical support to responsible
producers regarding program requirements, administering and collecting
payments to and reimbursements from the fund, and the investment types, if
any, the organization intends to use to manage monies within the fund.
(10) A description of the process for collectors to recoup all reasonable
activity-based costs, both operational and capital, from the producer
responsibility organization for collecting, transporting, or sorting packaging
materials covered under the stewardship plan.
House Bill 882-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(11) A description of how stakeholder comments were considered in the
development of the stewardship plan, including a summary and analysis of the
issues raised and significant changes recommended by stakeholders, a
statement of the reasons why any significant changes were not incorporated
into the proposed stewardship plan, and a description of any changes made to
the proposed stewardship plan as a result of such comments.
(12) Any additional information requested by the Department.
(c) A producer responsibility organization shall provide stakeholders, including units of
local government, municipal solid waste management facilities, recycling facilities, collectors,
and other members of the general public with an opportunity to review and comment on the draft
stewardship plan prior to its submission to the Department.
(d) A producer responsibility organization may prepare a revised stewardship plan and
submit it to the Department at any time the organization considers appropriate in response to
changed circumstances, including to incorporate additional responsible producers to an existing
stewardship plan.
"§ 130A-309.254. Review and approval of proposed stewardship plans.
(a) No later than 90 days after the submission of the stewardship plan, the Department
shall make a determination to approve the plan as submitted, approve the plan with conditions,
or deny the plan.
(b) In reviewing any stewardship plan under this Part, the Department shall consider
whether the stewardship plan:
(1) Adequately addresses all requirements set forth in G.S. 130A-309.238 with
sufficient detail.
(2) Provides a feasible strategy detailing how responsible producers will satisfy
the requirements established in G.S. 130A-309.236.
(3) Proposes participation fees that:
a. Sufficiently cover the entire cost of implementing the stewardship plan
and complying with all other requirements of this Part, including any
rules adopted by the Commission pursuant to this Part.
b. Adequately incentivize waste reduction and recycling compatibility
innovations and practices and discourage designs and practices that
increase the costs of managing packaging materials.
c. Equitably allocate implementation costs among responsible producers.
(4) Provides for widespread, convenient, and equitable collection opportunities,
as required pursuant to G.S. 130A-309.241.
(5) Provides for effective outreach and education programming, as required
pursuant to G.S. 130A-309.243.
(6) Provides a feasible strategy detailing how responsible producers will satisfy
the labeling requirements pursuant to G.S. 130A-309.242, including a
description of how the producer responsibility organization will verify each
producer's labeling claims through an independent, third-party audit.
(7) Proposes a schedule of collector reimbursement payments that are calculated
in a reasonable manner, pursuant to G.S. 130A-309.240, and that cover the
costs of collecting, recycling, processing, and disposing of the packaging
materials listed under the stewardship plan.
(8) Establishes a reasonable process for participating collectors to apply for and
receive reimbursements from the producer responsibility organization.
(9) Provides sufficient information to establish that the producer responsibility
organization engaged in a reasonable stakeholder review process, as required
pursuant to G.S. 130A-309.238(c).
(10) Satisfies any other requirements adopted by the Commission.
Page 6 House Bill 882-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) No later than six months after the date the stewardship plan is approved, the producer
responsibility organization and its member producers shall implement the approved plan.
"§ 130A-309.255. Collector reimbursement.
(a) Collector Reimbursement. – A producer responsibility organization shall be
responsible for calculating and dispersing funding for collectors that elect to be compensated by
the producer responsibility organization for the recovery, recycling, and processing of packaging
materials.
(b) Eligibility. – Collectors must provide for recycling of all recyclable packaging
material listed under a stewardship plan in order to be eligible for reimbursement under this
section.
(c) Calculation of Reimbursement. – The reimbursement rate shall be based on the cost
of residential curbside collection, including the cost of curbside containers where relevant, as
well as the processing cost for each readily recyclable material, the cost of handling non-readily
recyclable material types collected as part of a recycling operation, the transportation cost of
recycling for each material type, and any other cost factors as determined by the Department.
(d) Collector Responsibilities. –
(1) To facilitate the producer responsibility organization's determination of the
cost of recycling, participating collectors shall annually report to the
organization all information necessary for the organization to determine the
collector's incurred net costs associated with the collection, processing,
transportation, and recycling and disposal of packaging material covered
under the stewardship plan.
(2) Participating collectors shall not charge fees to customers for reimbursable
costs.
"§ 130A-309.256. Collection and convenience.
(a) A producer responsibility organization shall provide for widespread, convenient, and
equitable access to collection opportunities for the packaging material identified under the
stewardship plan.
(b) A producer responsibility organization may rely on a range of means to collect various
categories of packaging material, including curbside collection, depot drop-off, and retailer
take-back. However, a producer responsibility organization shall provide for curbside or
multifamily recycling collection services if all of the following circumstances apply:
(1) The category of packaging materials is suitable for residential curbside
recycling collection and can be effectively sorted by the facilities receiving
the packaging material.
(2) The recycling facility providing processing and sorting service agrees to
accept the category of packaging material.
(3) The provider of residential curbside recycling service agrees to the producer
responsibility organization's reimbursement arrangement.
(4) The category of packaging material is not handled through a deposit and return
scheme or a buyback system that relies on a collection system other than
curbside collection.
"§ 130A-309.257. Labeling.
Responsible producers shall indicate on all packaging material used for containing,
protecting, delivering, presenting, or distributing products sold, offered for sale, or distributed in
the State (i) the percentage of postconsumer waste material content, (ii) whether the packaging
material is readily recyclable, and (iii) whether the packaging material is compostable. Such
labels must be in a form deemed appropriate by the Department pursuant to rules adopted by the
Commission.
"§ 130A-309.258. Outreach and education.
House Bill 882-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) A producer responsibility organization shall provide effective outreach, education,
and communications to consumers throughout the State regarding:
(1) Proper end-of-life management of packaging materials.
(2) The location and availability of curbside and drop-off collection opportunities.
(3) Recycling and composting instructions that are (i) consistent statewide, except
as necessary to take into account differences among local ordinances and
processing capabilities, (ii) easy to understand, and (iii) easily accessible.
(b) The outreach and education required pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall:
(1) Be designed to achieve the packaging material requirements established
pursuant to G.S. 130A-309.236.
(2) Incorporate, at a minimum, electronic, print, web-based, and social media
elements that local governments may utilize at their discretion.
(3) Include, at a minimum, (i) consulting on education and outreach with local
governments and other stakeholders, (ii) coordinating with and assisting local
governments and solid waste facility operators, and other entities providing
services, and (iii) developing and providing outreach and education to the
diverse ethnic populations in the State.
(4) Include a plan to work with responsible producers to label packaging materials
with information to assist consumers in responsibly managing and recycling
the packaging materials.
(c) The Department shall review the effectiveness of outreach and education efforts under
this section to determine whether changes are necessary to improve those outreach and education
efforts and develop information that may be used to improve outreach and education efforts under
this section.
"§ 130A-309.259. Reporting requirements and audits.
(a) Each producer responsibility organization shall submit a report to the Department, in
a manner required by the Department, no later than July 1 each year following the approval of
the stewardship plan, evaluating progress toward meeting the requirements under this Part for
the immediately preceding year. The report shall include all of the following:
(1) The total amount of packaging material, by weight and unit, used for
containing, protecting, delivering, presenting, or distributing products sold,
offered for sale, or distributed into the State by each of its responsible
producers in the prior calendar year.
(2) Any information necessary for the Department to make a determination of the
producer responsibility organization's, and its member producers', compliance
with all of the following:
a. The non-reusable packaging reduction requirements, as provided by
G.S. 130A-309.236(c).
b. The recycling-rate requirements, as provided by
G.S. 130A-309.236(d).
c. The postconsumer waste material content requirements, as provided
by G.S. 130A-309.236(e).
d. The labeling requirements, as provided by G.S. 130A-309.242.
(3) The total costs of implementing the stewardship plan, accompanied by a copy
of an independent, third-party financial audit verifying these costs.
(4) The participation fees allocated to each of its responsible producers, including
a description of the methodology used to calculate the fees.
(5) An accounting of the reimbursements to participating collectors, including a
description of the methodology used to calculate the reimbursements.
(6) Any additional information requested by the Department.
Page 8 House Bill 882-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) The Department shall maintain the confidentiality of any information that is required
to be submitted by a responsible producer or producer responsibility organization under this Part
that is designated as a trade secret, as defined in G.S. 66-152(3), and that is designated as
confidential or as a trade secret under G.S. 132-1.2.
(c) The Department shall compile and publish on its website a list of responsible
producers and producer responsibility organizations that are out of compliance with the
applicable stewardship plan or the requirements of this Part.
"§ 130A-309.260. Fees.
The Commission may adopt rules setting fees for responsible producers and producer
responsibility organizations that defray the Department's cost of administering this Part,
including costs related to reviewing and processing stewardship plans, overseeing the
implementation of the plans, and ensuring compliance with the requirements of this Part.
"§ 130A-309.261. Penalties.
(a) This Part may be enforced as provided by Part 2 of Article 1 of this Chapter.
(b) If a penalty is imposed on a producer responsibility organization under this section,
each responsible producer participating in the producer responsibility organization is jointly and
severally liable for the payment of the penalty.
"§ 130A-309.262. Applicability.
(a) Except as provided by G.S. 130A-309.236(a) and subsection (b) of this section,
responsible producers are exempt from this Part when they meet any of the following exceptions
in this subsection:
(1) The producer generated less than two million dollars ($2,000,000) in gross
revenue during the immediately preceding calendar year.
(2) The producer sold, offered for sale, or distributed for sale less than 1 ton of
products in this State during the immediately preceding calendar year,
including packaging materials used to contain, protect, deliver, present, or
distribute the product.
(3) The producer conducted all product sales in this State during the immediately
preceding calendar year at a single point of retail sale that was not supplied or
operated as part of a franchise.
(b) A responsible producer shall submit to the Department sufficient information to
demonstrate that the producer, pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, is excluded from
regulation under this Part.
"§ 130A-309.263. Rulemaking.
The Commission may adopt rules to implement this Part."
SECTION 1.(b) This section becomes effective October 1, 2025, except that
G.S. 130A-309.236(b), 130A-309.240, 130A-309.241, 130A-309.242, and 130A-309.243
become effective October 1, 2026.

PART II. BAN CERTAIN TOXIC SUBSTANCES IN PACKAGING MATERIALS
SECTION 2.(a) Article 9 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new Part to read:
"Part 2L. Ban Manufacture and Distribution of Certain Toxic Substances in Packaging
Materials.
"§ 130A-309.270. Prohibition on manufacture and distribution of packaging materials
containing certain toxic substances.
(a) No person may knowingly do any of the following:
(1) Manufacture packaging material containing a covered toxic substance.
(2) Distribute, sell, or offer for sale, for use within the State or for export from the
State, any packaging material containing a covered toxic substance.
(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
House Bill 882-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Covered toxic substance. – Includes the following substances:
a. Ortho-phthalates.
b. Bisphenols.
c. PFAS.
d. Lead and lead compounds.
e. Hexavalent chromium and compounds.
f. Cadmium and cadmium compounds.
g. Mercury and mercury compounds.
h. Benzophenone and its derivatives.
i. Halogenated flame retardants.
j. Perchlorate.
k. Formaldehyde.
l. Toluene.
m. Polyvinyl chloride.
n. Polystyrene.
o. Polycarbonate.
(2) Packaging material. – As defined in G.S. 130A-309.235.
(3) PFAS. – Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances, a class of fluorinated
organic chemicals containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom.
"§ 130A-309.271. Civil penalties.
(a) The Secretary may assess a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars
($5,000) or, if the violation involves a hazardous waste, as defined in G.S. 130A-290, of not more
than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) against any person who violates a requirement of
this Part.
(b) If any action or failure to act for which a penalty may be assessed under subsection
(a) of this section is a repeat offense, the Secretary may assess a penalty not to exceed ten
thousand dollars ($10,000) per occurrence. A penalty for multiple occurrences shall not exceed
two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) in any month.
(c) In determining the amount of the penalty, the Secretary shall consider the factors set
out in G.S. 143B-282.1(b). The procedures set out in G.S. 143B-282.1 shall apply to civil penalty
assessments that are presented to the Commission for final agency decision.
(d) The Secretary shall notify any person assessed a civil penalty for the assessment and
the specific reasons therefor by registered or certified mail or by any means authorized by
G.S. 1A-1, Rule 4. Contested case petitions shall be filed pursuant to G.S. 150B-23 within 30
days of receipt of the notice of assessment.
(e) Requests for remission of civil penalties shall be filed with the Secretary. Remission
requests shall not be considered unless made within 30 days of receipt of the notice of assessment.
Remission requests must be accompanied by a waiver of the right to a contested case hearing
pursuant to Chapter 150B of the General Statutes and a stipulation of the facts on which the
assessment was based. Consistent with the limitations in G.S. 143B-282.1(c) and (d), remission
requests may be resolved by the Secretary and the violator. If the Secretary and the violator are
unable to resolve the request, the Secretary shall deliver the remission request and the
recommended action to the Committee on Civil Penalty Remissions of the Environmental
Management Commission appointed pursuant to G.S. 143B-282.1(c).
(f) If any civil penalty has not been paid within 30 days after notice of assessment has
been served on the violator, the Secretary shall request the Attorney General to institute a civil
action in the superior court of any county in which the violator resides or the violator's principal
place of business is located in order to recover the amount of the assessment, unless the violator
contests the assessment as provided in subsection (d) of this section or requests remission of the
assessment in whole or in part as provided in subsection (e) of this section. If any civil penalty
has not been paid within 30 days after the final agency decision or order has been served on the
Page 10 House Bill 882-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
violator, the Secretary shall request the Attorney General to institute a civil action in the superior
court of any county in which the violator resides or the violator's principal place of business is
located to recover the amount of the assessment. A civil action must be filed within three years
of the date the final agency decision or court order was served on the violator."
SECTION 2.(b) This section becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to
persons on or after that date who knowingly manufacture, distribute, sell, or offer for sale any
packaging materials containing covered toxic substances.

PART III. BAN INTENTIONALLY ADDED PFAS IN COVERED PRODUCTS
INCLUDING FOOD PACKAGING, COMPOSTABLE CONTAINERS, AND
PACKAGING COMPONENTS, AND TO APPROPRIATE FUNDS TO THE
DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY
SECTION 3. Article 21A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new Part to read:
"Part 8. Ban Manufacture, Use, and Distribution of Certain Toxic Chemicals.
"§ 143-215.104BB. Prohibition on manufacture, use, and distribution of PFAS within the
State.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this Part:
(1) Compostable. – An item that reliably and entirely breaks down and becomes
part of usable compost no later than 180 days after proper disposal.
Compostable items may be made from organic materials such as bagasse,
sugarcane, bamboo, paper, hay, or certified compostable plastics that meet the
American Society for Testing and Materials (ASTM) standard specifications
for industrially compostable plastics D6400 and compostable plastic coatings
D6868. Permitted compostable plastics, often marketed as biodegradable,
must be clearly labeled with the applicable standard on the product.
(2) Covered product. – Any product subject to the requirements of this Part,
including food packaging.
(3) Food package or food packaging. – A package, compostable container, or
packaging component that is intended for direct food content.
(4) Intentionally added PFAS. – Any of the following:
a. PFAS added to a product or one of the product's components that have
a function or technical effect in the product, including the PFAS
components of products that constitute added chemicals or products
thereof.
b. PFAS used or produced during the manufacture or processing of a
product introduced into or onto the product, including any source of
PFAS that is reasonably known to be present, such as using processing
agents, mold release agents, or fluorination.
(5) Manufacturer. – The person who manufactures a product or whose brand
name is affixed to the product. If the product is imported into the United
States, the term "manufacturer" includes the importer or first domestic
distributor of the product, if the person that manufactured or assembled the
product or whose brand name is affixed to the product does not have a
principal place of business in the United States.
(6) PFAS. – Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances, a class of fluorinated
organic chemicals containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom.
(7) Product. – An item manufactured, assembled, packaged, or otherwise
prepared for sale to consumers, including its product components, sold or
distributed for personal, residential, commercial, or industrial use, including
House Bill 882-First Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
for use in making other products. This does not include used products offered
for sale or resale.
(8) Product component. – An identifiable component of a product, regardless of
whether the manufacturer of the product is the manufacturer of the
component.
(9) Product label. – A display of written, printed, or graphic material that appears
on, or is affixed to, the exterior of a product, or its exterior container or
wrapper that is visible to a consumer, if the product has an exterior container
or wrapper.
(b) No person may knowingly manufacture, sell, or offer for sale any covered product
that contains intentionally added PFAS in this State. A manufacturer of a covered product shall
provide persons that offer the covered product for sale in this State with a certificate of
compliance stating, at a minimum, that the covered product is in compliance with the
requirements of this Part and does not contain any intentionally added PFAS. A certificate of
compliance provided under this subsection shall be signed by an authorized official or
representative of the manufacturer. The certificate of compliance may be provided to persons
through electronic means.
(c) This Part shall not apply to the sale or resale of used products."
SECTION 4.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Environmental Quality the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 4.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 5. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes effective October 1,
2025.
Page 12 House Bill 882-First Edition